Massachusetts, session 194th, SD4054.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of said section the following 
paragraph:- 
“Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the registrar shall permit 
letters and numbers to be used in any sequence on standard passenger vanity plates. No 
application for such a plate shall be denied solely due to the placement or order of letters and 
numbers, provided that all other applicable statutory and regulatory requirements, including but 
not limited to character count, are met.” 
SECTION 2. This act shall apply to all vanity plate applications received on or after the 
effective date of this act. Any vanity plate issued prior to the effective date shall remain valid and 
unaffected.  
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.